Utah statutes.
79-4-702.   Agreement to manage -- Management fee.

(1)  In recognition of the need for private funds to continue the expansion and improvement of Old Deseret Village, a living history museum at the park, and the preference of donors to contribute to nonprofit organizations rather than government entities, the division may make an agreement with the foundation to manage, develop, and promote the park.

(2)  The division may pay a management fee to the foundation.

(3)  The division may not require the foundation to remit to the division any portion of the income generated from park operations.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 344, 2009 General Session

